New Jersey, session 221, A143.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 32 of P.L.1941, c.274 (C.4:12A-32) is amended to read as follows: 32.  a.  The application for license shall be made on a form prepared by the director.  The director may require an applicant for a license to show that he has secured all other State licenses and such other permits or licenses as may be necessary for said applicant to carry on the milk business in his territory, and upon his failure to do so refuse to issue to said applicant a license. b.    The department shall provide on its Internet website for the electronic submittal of milk dealer license applications to the department. (cf:  P.L.1941, c.274, s.32) 2.    This act shall take effect two years following the date of enactment. STATEMENT Currently, the Department of Agriculture does not provide on its Internet website for the electronic submittal of milk dealer license applications to the department.  Instead, an applicant must print the form out from the Department of Agricultures website, fill it out, and mail it to the department.  By providing for electronic application submittals, this bill will streamline the application process for both the applicant and the department.